Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.110

Revenue bonds—Form, terms, etc.

If the legislative authority of a municipality deems it advisable to finance all or a portion of the costs of planning, purchase, leasing, condemnation, or other acquisition, construction, reconstruction, development, improvement, and extension of a heating system, or for the implementation of the powers in RCW 35.97.030 and 35.97.040, or for working capital, interest during construction and for a period of up to one year thereafter, debt service and other reserves, and the costs of issuing revenue obligations, a municipality may issue revenue bonds against the special fund or fund created from revenues or assessments. The revenue bonds so issued may be issued in one or more series and shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, and shall mature at such time or times as may be determined by the legislative authority of the municipality, and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the legislative authority of the municipality prior to the issuance of the bonds. The legislative authority of the municipality shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest. If an officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature shall for all purposes have the same effect as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form or both, and provisions may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to the principal alone and also as to both principal and interest and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. Bonds may be sold at public or private sale for such price and bearing interest at such fixed or variable rate as may be determined by the legislative authority of the municipality.

The principal of and interest on any revenue bonds shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts derived from the heating system, including any amounts pledged to be paid into a special fund under RCW 35.97.100, and may be secured by a mortgage covering all or any part of the system, including any enlargements of and additions to such system thereafter made. The revenue bonds shall state upon their face that they are payable from a special fund, naming it and the ordinance creating it, and that they do not constitute a general indebtedness of the municipality. The ordinance or resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage may contain agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the system, the fixing and collection of rates and charges, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues, the rights and remedies available in the event of default, and other matters improving the marketability of the revenue bonds, all as the legislative authority of the municipality deems advisable. Any revenue bonds issued under this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the municipality and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within the state. Any such trust agreement or ordinance or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bond owners as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bond owners and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action by bond owners as is customary in trust agreements or trust indentures.

[ 1983 c 216 s 11.]